District of Columbia statutes.
2-1535.06

Bullying prevention programs.

Following the adoption of a bullying prevention policy, as required by § 2-1535.03, each agency, educational institution, and grantee may:

(1)

Establish an annual bullying prevention program for youth, which for each educational institution should align with established health-education standards;

(2)

Inform youth about their right to be free from discrimination in public accommodations and education, and of the redress available for a violation of their rights under the Human Rights Act; and

(3)

Provide training on bullying prevention to all employees and volunteers who have significant contact with youth.

Sept. 14, 2012, D.C. Law 19-167, § 7, 59 DCR 7820
This section is referenced in § 2-1535.02.